California statutes. Insurance Code
(3) Insurers writing life insurance policies that do not build nonforfeiture values shall only be required to provide an annual report with respect to these policies for those years when a change has been made to nonguaranteed policy elements by the insurer.

(b) If the annual report does not include an in force illustration, it shall contain the following notice displayed prominently: “IMPORTANT POLICY OWNER NOTICE: You should consider requesting more detailed information about your policy to understand how it may perform in the future. You should not consider replacement of your policy or make changes in your coverage without requesting a current illustration. You may annually request, without charge, such an illustration by calling [insurer’s phone number], writing to [insurer’s address] or contacting your agent. If you do not receive a current illustration of your policy within thirty days from your request, you should contact your state insurance department.” The insurer may vary the sequential order of the methods for obtaining an in force illustration.

(c) Upon the request of the policy owner, the insurer shall furnish an in force illustration of current and future benefits and values based on the insurer’s present illustrated scale. This illustration shall comply with the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 10509.955 and subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 10509.956. No signature or other acknowledgment of receipt of this illustration shall be required.

(d) If an adverse change in nonguaranteed elements that could affect the policy has been made by the insurer since the last annual report, the annual report shall contain a notice of that fact and the nature of the change prominently displayed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 10509.965.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.960.

(a) The board of directors of each insurer shall appoint one or more illustration actuaries.

(b) The illustration actuary shall certify that the disciplined current scale used in illustrations is in conformity with the Actuarial Standard of Practice for Compliance with the NAIC Model Regulation on Life Insurance Illustrations promulgated by the Actuarial Standards Board, and that the illustrated scales used in insurer-authorized illustrations meet the requirements of this chapter.

(c) The illustration actuary shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Be a member in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries.

(2) Be familiar with the standard of practice regarding life insurance policy illustrations.

(3) Not been found by the commissioner, following appropriate notice and hearing, to have engaged in or committed any of the following acts:

(A) Violated any provision of, or any obligation imposed by, the insurance law or other law in the course of his or her dealings as an illustration actuary.

(B) Been found guilty of fraudulent or dishonest practices.

(C) Demonstrated his or her incompetence, lack of cooperation, or untrustworthiness to act as an illustration actuary.

(D) Resigned or been removed as an illustration actuary within the past five years as a result of acts or omissions indicated in any adverse report on examination or as a result of a failure to adhere to generally acceptable actuarial standards.

(4) Notify the commissioner of any acts engaged in or committed in another state that are similar to those described in paragraph (3).

(5) Disclose in the annual certification whether, since the last certification, a currently payable scale applicable for business issued within the previous five years and within the scope of the certification has been reduced for reasons other than changes in the experience factors underlying the disciplined current scale. Nonguaranteed elements illustrated for new policies that are not consistent with those illustrated for similar in force policies shall be disclosed in the annual certification. Nonguaranteed elements illustrated for both new and in force policies that are not consistent with the nonguaranteed elements actually being paid, charged or credited to the same or similar forms shall be disclosed in the annual certification.

(6) Disclose in the annual certification the method used to allocate overhead expenses for all illustrations including:

(A) Fully allocated expenses.

(B) Marginal expenses.

(C) A generally recognized expense table based on fully allocated expenses representing a significant portion of insurance companies and approved by the commissioner.

(d) (1) The illustration actuary shall file a certification with the board of directors of the insurer and with the commissioner as follows:

(A) Annually for all policy forms for which illustrations are used.

(B) Before a new policy form is illustrated.

(2) If an error in a previous certification is discovered, the illustration actuary shall notify the board of directors of the insurer and the commissioner promptly.

(e) If an illustration actuary is unable to certify the scale for any policy form illustration the insurer intends to use, the actuary shall notify the board of directors of the insurer and the commissioner promptly of his or her inability to certify.

(f) A responsible officer of the insurer, other than the illustration actuary, shall certify annually the following:

(1) The illustration formats meet the requirements of this chapter and the scales used in insurer-authorized illustrations are those scales certified by the illustration actuary.

(2) The company provided its agents with information about the expense allocation method used by the company in its illustrations and complied with the disclosure requirements of paragraph (6) of subdivision (c).

(g) The annual certifications shall be provided to the commissioner each year by a date determined by the insurer.

(h) If an insurer changes the illustration actuary responsible for all or a portion of the company’s policy forms, the insurer shall notify the commissioner of that fact promptly and disclose the reason for the change.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 10509.965.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.961.

In addition to any other penalties provided by law, an insurer or producer that violates any provision of this chapter shall be subject to Section 790.06.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 10509.965.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.962.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 10509.965.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.963.

If the commissioner has reason to believe that any insurer has violated this chapter, the commissioner may request and the insurer shall file both of the following:

(a) An example of the annual report to the policy owner with notice of adverse change in nonguaranteed elements.

(b) An example of an illustration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.964.

Review by the commissioner of illustrations, supporting materials, certifications, and any and all other materials prepared pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to Section 736.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Section operative July 1, 1997, pursuant to Section 10509.965.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.965.

This chapter shall become effective on and after July 1, 1997, and shall apply to policies sold on or after that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed effective (operative) date of July 1, 1997, for Chapter 5.5, commencing with Section 10509.950.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.6. Life Insurance Cost Indexes [10509.970. - 10509.975.]

10509.970.

It is the purpose of this chapter to assure prospective purchasers of life insurance that, when a presentation is made showing or comparing the cost of life insurance over a period of years which does not recognize the time value of money, it shall be accompanied by a presentation which recognizes the time value of money.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.971.

(a) If, in connection with the selling of life insurance to which this chapter applies, an agent or insurer makes a presentation showing or comparing the cost of life insurance over a period of years which does not recognize the time value of money, the agent or insurer shall at the same time present the Life Insurance Surrender Cost Index and the Life Insurance Net Payment Cost Index which shall be calculated for both a 10-year and a 20-year period.

(b) An agent or insurer may use any other system or form of presentation for comparing the cost of life insurance over a period of years which recognizes the time value of money, including the Life Insurance Surrender Cost Index and the Life Insurance Net Payment Cost Index computed at an interest rate other than 5 percent.

(c) If the Life Insurance Surrender Cost Index or the Life Insurance Net Payment Cost Index is used, it need not be provided for a period which extends beyond the end of the premium payment period for the plan. The Life Insurance Surrender Cost Index and the Life Insurance Net Payment Cost Index shall be accompanied by an explanation substantially to the effect that the Life Insurance Surrender Cost Index and the Life Insurance Net Payment Cost Index are measures of the relative cost of similar plans of insurance, and that a low index number represents a lower cost than a higher index number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.972.

(a) The Life Insurance Surrender Cost Index for level premium plans of insurance shall be calculated by applying the steps in the following paragraphs:

(1) Select either a 10-year or a 20-year period, commencing with the first year of the policy, over which the analysis is to be made.

(2) Determine the cash surrender value, and terminal dividend, if any, available at the end of the period selected.

(3) For participating policies, accumulate the annual cash dividends at 5 percent interest compounded annually to the end of the period selected and add this accumulation to the amount in paragraph (2).

(4) Divide the amount in paragraph (3), or the amount in paragraph (2) for nonparticipating policies, by an interest factor that converts it into a level annual amount accruing over the period selected in paragraph (1). If the period is 10 years, this factor is 13.207, and if the period is 20 years, the factor is 34.719.

(5) Subtract the amount in paragraph (4) from the annual premium payable.

(6) Divide the amount in paragraph (5) by the number of thousands of the amount of insurance to arrive at the Life Insurance Surrender Cost Index.

(b) The Life Insurance Surrender Cost Index for plans of insurance with premiums which are not level shall be calculated as follows:

(1) Select either a 10-year or a 20-year period, commencing with the first year of the policy, over which the analysis is to be made.

(2) Determine the cash surrender value, and terminal dividend, if any, available at the end of the period selected.

(3) For participating policies, accumulate the annual cash dividends at 5 percent interest compounded annually to the end of the period selected and add this accumulation to the amount in paragraph (2).

(4) Divide the amount in paragraph (3), or the amount in paragraph (2) for nonparticipating policies, by an interest factor that converts it into a level annual amount accruing over the period selected in paragraph (1). If the period is 10 years, this factor is 13.207, and if the period is 20 years, the factor is 34.719.

(5) Subtract the amount in paragraph (4) from the equivalent level premium determined by accumulating the annual premium payable at 5 percent interest compounded annually to the end of the period in paragraph (1) and dividing the result by the factor stated in paragraph (4).

(6) Divide the amount in paragraph (5) by the number of thousands of the amount of insurance to arrive at the Life Insurance Surrender Cost Index.

(c) For plans of insurance where the amount of insurance is not level, the amount of insurance in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) and paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) shall be calculated as follows:

(1) Accumulate the amount payable upon death, regardless of the cause of death, at the beginning of each policy year at 5 percent interest compounded annually to the end of the period selected in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(2) Divide the amount in paragraph (1) by an interest factor that converts it into a level amount of insurance that, if paid at the beginning of each year, would accrue to the amount of paragraph (1) over the period selected in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b). If this period is 10 years, this factor is 13.207, and if the period is 20 years, the factor is 34.719.

(d) The Life Insurance Net Payment Cost Index is calculated in the same manner as the comparable Life Insurance Surrender Cost Index except that the cash surrender value and any terminal dividend are set at zero.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.973.

Any comparison must be used with caution and should not be emphasized to the point that actual premiums and policy benefits are overshadowed. Only similar plans of insurance should be compared. Any dividend or nonguaranteed element used in calculating the Life Insurance Surrender Cost Index or the Life Insurance Net Payment Cost Index shall be based on nonguaranteed elements calculated according to the standards required in Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 10509.950). With respect to participating policies, care must be taken to describe the policy dividend as a refund or return of part of the premium paid, which is not guaranteed and which is dependent on the investment earnings, mortality experience, and expense experience of the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1106, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.974.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this chapter shall apply to any solicitation, negotiation, or procurement of life insurance occurring within this state.

(b) This chapter shall not apply to:

(1) Variable life insurance.

(2) Individual and group annuity contracts.

(3) Credit life insurance.

(4) Life insurance policies with no illustrated death benefits on any individual exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(5) Franchise life insurance.

(6) Group term life insurance.

(7) Life insurance policies issued in connection with pension and welfare plans as defined by and subject to the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 and following), as amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 379, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.975.

(a) A life insurer shall provide to all prospective insureds a buyer’s guide prior to accepting the applicant’s initial premium or premium deposit. However, if the policy for which application is made contains an unconditional refund provision of at least 10 days, the buyer’s guide shall be delivered with the policy or prior to delivery of the policy.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, a buyer’s guide is a document that contains, and is limited to, the current buyer’s guide recommended for use by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 90.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Incorporated Life Insurers Issuing Policies on a Reserve Basis [10510. - 10541.]



  ARTICLE 1. Capital [10510. - 10512.]

10510.

An incorporated life insurer issuing policies on the reserve basis shall not transact life insurance in this state unless it has a paid-in capital of at least two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,250,000) plus the surplus required by Section 700.02 and Section 700.05.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 418, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10511.

If authorized by its charter, such an incorporated life insurer may, except as provided in Section 700.03, transact, in addition to life insurance, any of the following classes of insurance if its total paid-in capital is at least two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,250,000) in excess of the sum of the amounts set forth opposite the classes of insurance transacted: Number and name of classAmount of capitalclass transactedto be added 6. Disability 250,000 8. Liability
 9. Workers’ 
compensation
 10. Common carrier
liability⎫⎪⎬⎪⎭300,000 
for all or any 
of them

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 418, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10512.

An insurer holding a certificate of authority for life insurance and any other proper class on December 31, 1989, shall be governed by the provisions of Section 700.05, 10510, and 10511 in effect on December 31, 1989, until December 31, 1999. After December 31, 1999, any insurer holding a certificate of authority for life insurance and any other proper class shall meet the capital requirement of Sections 10510 and 10511 as become effective January 1, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 418, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Dividends [10530. - 10530.]

10530.

(a) A domestic incorporated life insurer issuing policies on the reserve plan shall not make any dividends, except from earned surplus.

(b) No dividends shall be declared out of earned surplus derived from the mere appreciation in the value of assets not yet realized, nor shall any dividends be declared from any part of earned surplus derived from an exchange of assets, unless and until earned surplus has been realized, or unless the assets received are currently realizable in cash.

(c) An insurer may declare and distribute a dividend otherwise prohibited by this section if (1) following payment of the dividend the insurer’s surplus as regards policyholders is (A) reasonable in relation to its outstanding liabilities and (B) adequate to its financial needs as prescribed in Section 1215.5, and (2) the commissioner has given approval for the dividend prior to payment.

(d) For purposes of this section, “earned surplus” means unassigned funds, as required to be reported on the insurer’s annual statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 974, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Premiums and Premium Accounts [10540. - 10541.]

10540.

An incorporated life insurer issuing life insurance policies on the reserve basis may collect premiums in advance. Such insurers may also accept moneys for the payment of future premiums related to any policies issued by it. No such insurer may accept such moneys in an amount to exceed (1) the sum of future unpaid premiums on any such policy or (2) the sum of 10 such future unpaid annual premiums on any such policy if such sum is less than the sum of future unpaid premiums on any such policy. This section shall not limit the right of such insurers to accept funds under an agreement which provides for an accumulation of such funds for the purpose of purchasing annuities at future dates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2314.)
-------------------------------------------

10541.

(a) Insurers authorized to deliver or issue for delivery life insurance policies in this state may deliver or issue for delivery one or more funding agreements, but the issuance or delivery of those funding agreements shall not be deemed to be doing the insurance business described in Section 700, a class of business as provided in Section 100 or 101, a “security” as defined in Section 821, or receipt of “gross premiums” as defined in Section 12221 or 12222 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Notwithstanding the definition of “insurance” in Section 22 or the definition of “life insurance” in Section 101, the issuance or delivery of a funding agreement by an admitted life insurer in this state shall constitute a lawful activity of that insurer that is reasonably related to and incidental to its insurance activities as provided in this section. However, this section shall not authorize any insurer to transact, under the guise of funding agreements, any class of insurance not authorized by its certificate of authority.

(b) As used in this section, the term “funding agreement” means an agreement that authorizes an admitted life insurer to accept funds and that provides for an accumulation of those funds for the purpose of making one or more payments at future dates in amounts that are not based on mortality or morbidity contingencies. However, the term “funding agreement” does not include any agreement in connection with the funding of one or more payments that are excludable from the gross income of the recipient under Section 104(a)(2) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, as it may be amended or renumbered from time to time.

(c) No amounts shall be guaranteed or credited under any funding agreement except upon reasonable assumptions as to investment income and expenses and on a basis equitable to all holders of funding agreements of a given class.

(d) Amounts paid to the insurer, and proceeds applied under optional modes of settlement, under those funding agreements may be allocated by the insurer to one or more separate accounts pursuant to Section 10506.

(e) The commissioner may establish reasonable conditions or adopt reasonable regulations relating to (1) the reserves to be maintained by insurers issuing those funding agreements, (2) the accounting and reporting of funds credited under those funding agreements, (3) the disclosure of information to be given to holders and prospective holders of those funding agreements, (4) the qualification of persons selling those funding agreements on behalf of insurers, and (5) any other matters relating to funding agreements that the commissioner considers necessary, proper, and advisable.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner shall have sole authority to regulate the issuance and sale of those funding agreements, including the persons selling those funding agreements on behalf of insurers.

(g) Nothing in this section is intended to affect the order in which allowed claims shall be given preference under Section 1033. Holders of funding agreements shall retain the priority in allowance of claims described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1033.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 386, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Disability Insurance Disclosure [10600. - 10609.]

10600.

This part shall be known and may be referred to as the “Health Insurance Disclosure Act of 1974.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

10601.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Benefits and coverage” means the accident, sickness or disability indemnity available under a policy of disability insurance.

(b) “Exception” means any provision in a policy whereby coverage for a specified hazard or condition is entirely eliminated.

(c) “Reduction” means any provision in a policy which reduces the amount of a policy benefit to some amount or period less than would be otherwise payable for medically authorized expenses or services had such a reduction not been used. 

(d) “Limitation” means any provision other than an exception or a reduction which restricts coverage under the policy.

(e) “Presenting for examination or sale” means either (1) publication and dissemination of any brochure, mailer, advertisement, or form which constitutes a presentation of the provisions of the policy and which provides a policy enrollment or application form, or (2) consultations or discussions between prospective beneficiaries or their contract agents and employees or agents of disability insurers, when such consultations or discussions include presentation of formal, organized information about the policy which is intended to influence or inform the prospective insured or beneficiary, such as brochures, summaries, charts, slides, or other modes of information in lieu of or in addition to the policy itself.

(f) “Disability insurance” means every policy of disability insurance, self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, and nonprofit hospital service plan issued, delivered, or entered into pursuant to or described in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10110), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 10270), or Chapter 11A (commencing with Section 11491) of this part.

(g) “Insurer” means every insurer transacting disability insurance, every self-insured employee welfare plan, and every nonprofit hospital service plan specified in subdivision (e).

(h) “Disclosure form” means the standard supplemental disclosure form required pursuant to Section 10603.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

10602.

For the purposes of this chapter, where the definition of the term “hospital” in the policy omits care in any “health facility” defined pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, the omitted coverage shall constitute a limitation. Further, where the definition of the term “nursing home” in the policy omits care in any “health facility” defined pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, the omitted coverage shall constitute a limitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

10602.1.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent an insurer which makes contracts with hospitals from distinguishing between contracting hospitals and noncontracting hospitals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 936.)
-------------------------------------------

10603.

(a) (1) On or before April 1, 1975, the commissioner shall promulgate a standard supplemental disclosure form for all disability insurance policies. Upon the appropriate disclosure form as prescribed by the commissioner, each insurer shall provide, in easily understood language and in a uniform, clearly organized manner, as prescribed and required by the commissioner, the summary information about each disability insurance policy offered by the insurer as the commissioner finds is necessary to provide for full and fair disclosure of the provisions of the policy.

(2) On and after January 1, 2014, a disability insurer offering health insurance coverage subject to Section 2715 of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-15)
 shall satisfy the requirements of this section and the implementing regulations by providing the uniform summary of benefits and coverage required under Section 2715 of the federal Public Health Service Act and any rules or regulations issued thereunder. An insurer that issues the federal uniform summary of benefits referenced in this paragraph shall ensure that all applicable disclosures required in this chapter and its implementing regulations are met in other documents provided to policyholders and insureds. An insurer subject to this paragraph shall provide the uniform summary of benefits and coverage to the commissioner together with the corresponding health insurance policy pursuant to Section 10290.

(3) Commencing October 1, 2016, the uniform summary of benefits and coverage referenced in this subdivision shall constitute a vital document for the purposes of Section 10133.8. Not later than July 1, 2016, the commissioner shall develop
 written translations of the template uniform summary of benefits and coverage for all language groups identified by the State Department of Health Care Services in all plan letters as of August 27, 2014, for translation services pursuant to Section 14029.91 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, except for any language group for which the United States Department of Labor has already prepared a written translation. Not later than July 1, 2016, the commissioner shall make available on the department’s Internet Web site written translations of the template uniform summary of benefits and coverage developed by the commissioner, and written translations prepared by the United States Department of Labor, if available, for any language group to which this subparagraph applies.

(b) This section does not preclude the disclosure form from being included with the evidence of coverage or certificate of coverage or
 policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 212.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10603.04.

(a) For policy years on and after January 1, 2021, or 12 months after regulations are adopted under subdivision (f), whichever occurs later, a health insurer that issues, sells, renews, or offers a policy that covers dental services in this state, in addition to any other applicable disclosure requirements, shall use a uniform benefits and coverage disclosure matrix, which shall be developed by the department, in conjunction with the Department of Managed Health Care, and in consultation with stakeholders. At a minimum, the benefits and coverage disclosure matrix shall require the health insurer to make available all of the following
 relating to covered dental services, together with the corresponding copayments
 or coinsurance and limitations:

(1) The annual overall policy deductible.

(2) The annual benefit limit.

(3) Coverage for the following categories:

(A) Preventive and diagnostic services.

(B) Basic services.

(C) Major services.

(D) Orthodontia services.

(4) Dental policy reimbursement
 levels and estimated insured cost share for service.

(5) Waiting periods.

(6) Examples to illustrate coverage and estimated insured costs of commonly used benefits. The examples shall include at least one service from each of the following categories listed in paragraph (3):

(A) Preventive and diagnostic services.

(B) Basic services.

(C) Major
 services.

(b) All health insurers, solicitors, and representatives of a health insurer that issue, sell, renew, or offer a policy that covers dental services shall, when presenting any policy for examination or sale to an individual prospective insured, make available to the individual a properly completed benefits and coverage disclosure matrix, as prescribed by the commissioner pursuant to this section for each dental policy examined or sold.

(c) In the case of group policies for dental services, the completed disclosures and coverage matrix and evidence of coverage shall be made available to the policyholder upon delivery of the completed policy for dental insurance.

(d) Group policyholders
 shall make available the completed benefits and coverage disclosure matrix to all persons eligible to be a policyholder under the group policy at the time those persons are offered the dental insurance. If the individual group members are offered a choice of dental policies, separate benefits and coverage disclosure matrices shall be made available for each dental policy offered. Each group policyholder shall also make available copies of the evidence of coverage to all applicants, upon request, prior to enrollment and to all policyholders insured under the group policy.

(e) The health insurer offering a policy that covers dental services in the individual, small, or large group
 market shall make available the benefits and coverage disclosure matrix to all individuals newly enrolling for coverage, experiencing a special enrollment event, and renewing coverage, and shall make available the benefits and coverage disclosure matrix to all other insureds upon request. 

(f) (1) The department shall adopt emergency regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code to implement this section. The department shall consult with the Department of Managed Health Care in adopting the emergency regulations, as appropriate. The adoption of regulations pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
 safety.

(2) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. The regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State. The regulations shall not remain in effect more than 120 days unless the adopting agency complies with all of the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) as required by subdivision (c) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(g) This section does not apply to Medi-Cal dental managed care contracts authorized under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 933, Sec. 5.   (SB 1008)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10604.

The disclosure form shall include the following information, in concise and specific terms, relative to the disability insurance policy:

(a) The applicable category or categories of coverage provided by the policy, from among the following:

(1) Basic hospital expense coverage.

(2) Basic medical-surgical expense coverage.

(3) Hospital confinement indemnity coverage.

(4) Major medical expense coverage.

(5) Disability income protection coverage.

(6) Accident only coverage.

(7) Specified disease or specified accident coverage.

(8) Such other categories as the commissioner may prescribe.

(b) The principal benefits and coverage of the disability insurance policy.

(c) The exceptions, reductions, and limitations that apply to such policy.

(d) A summary, including a citation of the relevant contractual provisions, of the process used to authorize or deny payments for services under the coverage provided by the policy including coverage for subacute care, transitional inpatient care, or care provided in skilled nursing facilities. This subdivision shall only apply to policies of disability insurance that cover hospital, medical, or surgical expenses.

(e) The full premium cost of such policy.

(f) Any copayment, coinsurance, or deductible requirements that may be incurred by the insured or his family in obtaining coverage under the policy.

(g) The terms under which the policy may be renewed by the insured, including any reservation by the insurer of any right to change premiums.

(h) A statement that the disclosure form is a summary only, and that the policy itself should be consulted to determine governing contractual provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1024, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10604.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the right of every patient to receive basic information necessary to give full and informed consent is a fundamental tenet of good public health policy and has long been the established law of this state. Some hospitals and other providers do not provide a full range of reproductive health services and may prohibit or otherwise not provide sterilization, infertility treatments, abortion, or contraceptive services, including emergency contraception. It is the intent of the Legislature that every patient be given full and complete information about the health care services available to allow patients to make well informed health care decisions.

(b) On or before July 1, 2001, every disability insurer that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical benefits, and which provides a list of network providers to prospective insureds and insureds, shall do both of the following:

(1) Include the following statement, in at least 12-point boldface type, at the beginning of each provider directory:

“Some hospitals and other providers do not provide one or more of the following services that may be covered under your policy and that you or your family member might need: family planning; contraceptive services, including emergency contraception; sterilization, including tubal ligation at the time of labor and delivery; infertility treatments; or abortion. You should obtain more information before you become a policyholder or select a network provider. Call your prospective doctor or clinic, or call the insurer at (insert the insurer’s membership services number or other appropriate number that individuals can call for assistance) to ensure that you can obtain the health care services that you need.” 

(2) Place the statement described in paragraph (1) in a prominent location on any provider directory posted on the insurer’s website, if any, and include this statement in a conspicuous place in the insurer’s evidence of coverage and disclosure forms.

(c) A disability insurer shall not be required to provide the statement described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) in a service area in which none of the hospitals, health facilities, clinics, medical groups, or independent practice associations with which it contracts limit or restrict any of the reproductive services described in the statement.

(d) This section shall not apply to vision-only, dental-only, accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, Medicare supplement, long-term care, or disability income insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 347, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10604.5.

An insurer shall annually disclose to the governing board of a public agency that is the policyholder of a group health insurance policy, the name and address of, and amount paid to, any agent, broker, or individual to whom the insurer paid fees or commissions related to the public agency’s group health insurance policy. As part of this disclosure, the insurer shall include the name, address, and amounts paid to the specific agents, brokers, or individuals involved in transactions with the public agency. The compensation disclosure required by this section is in addition to any other compensation disclosure requirements that exist under law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 331, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10605.
